Illinois, session 104th, HB3378.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 5of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6adding Section 2015-410 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2105/2015-410 new)8    Sec. 2015-410. Continuing education credit.9    (a) An instructor who teaches a continuing education 10course or who serves as a trainer for a continuing education 11course required under this Act or any licensing Act 12administered by the Department shall be eligible to receive 13the same credit for the class that a student taking the class 14would receive. An instructor may count these credits toward 15meeting the minimum credit hours required for continuing 16education.17    (b) The Department may adopt rules to implement and 18administer this Section.